Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2010
Facility, defined.

Facility shall mean any site owned and operated or utilized by any person for the collection, source separation, storage, transportation, transfer, processing, treatment, or disposal of solid waste and shall include a solid waste landfill.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 10.